Utah statutes.
9-8-505.   Rule Against Perpetuities and Rule Restricting Unreasonable Restraints on Alienation not applicable.

The rule of property known as the Rule Against Perpetuities and the rule of property known as the Rule Restricting Unreasonable Restraints on Alienation may not be applied to defeat any of the provisions of this part or of any deed, lease, conveyance, covenant, easement, or other interest created or document executed in accordance with the provisions of this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 241, 1992 General Session

